District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3531.08

Establishment, purpose, and membership of the Tenant Advisory Council.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2068, 52 DCR 7503
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 266(b), 62 DCR 1884

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2068 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 266(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 266(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).